Texas statutes.
LOCAL GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 8. ACQUISITION, SALE, OR LEASE OF PROPERTY

SUBTITLE B. COUNTY ACQUISITION, SALE, OR LEASE OF PROPERTY

CHAPTER 261. COUNTY RIGHT OF EMINENT DOMAIN

Sec. 261.001. RIGHT OF EMINENT DOMAIN. (a) A county may exercise the right of eminent domain to condemn and acquire land, an easement in land, or a right-of-way if the acquisition is necessary for the construction of a jail, courthouse, hospital, or library, or for another public use authorized by law.

(b) The right of eminent domain conferred by this section extends to public or private land, but not to land used for cemetery purposes.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 81 (S.B. 18), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 261.002. PROCEDURE. The condemnation proceedings must be instituted in the name of the county and under the direction of the commissioners court.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 261.003. APPEAL. (a) An appeal from a finding and assessment of damages made as prescribed by Chapter 21, Property Code, does not suspend work by the county that relates to the land the county seeks to acquire.

(b) A county is not required to give a bond in an appealed case.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.